New Jersey, session 222, A1982.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: Business entity means any natural or legal person, business corporation, professional services corporation, limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership, business trust, association, or any other legal commercial entity organized under the laws of this State or any other state or foreign jurisdiction. Chat means any tool used by a business entity to provide real-time, text-based communication with a consumer. Transcript means a typed or printed verbatim record of a chat. b.    A business entity that uses chat to communicate with a consumer shall provide the consumer with an option to receive a transcript of the chat at the conclusion of the interaction.  The business entity shall provide clear and conspicuous notice to the consumer at the outset of any interaction, informing the consumer of the option to receive a transcript of the chat. c.     1[A violation of the provisions of this section shall be an unlawful practice and a violation of P.L.1960, c.39 (C.56:8-1 et seq.)] A person who violates the provisions of this section is subject to a civil penalty of: 1) $500 for a first offense on the first day of the violation; and 2) $1,000 for a second or subsequent offense per day of the violation. The civil penalty shall be collected by the director in a summary proceeding before a court of competent jurisdiction pursuant to the provisions of the "Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999," P.L.1999, c.274 (C.2A:58-10 et seq.). d.    The Director of the Division of Consumer Affairs in the Department of Law and Public Safety may, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this section1. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.